Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2638.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3020. Telecommunications line repair and tree limb removal.(a) Duty.--Upon receiving notice from a municipality or Commonwealth agency that a telecommunications line has been damaged, broken, cut or is in direct contact with a tree limb and the condition interferes with or endangers vehicle or pedestrian traffic, a telecommunications carrier shall, as soon as practicable based on the severity of the condition, take any of the following actions as applicable:(1) Remove the tree limb.(2) Remediate or repair the telecommunications line.123456789101112131415161718 (b) Cost recovery.--A telecommunications carrier may not recover the cost of removal, remediation or repair under subsection (a) from a customer or rate class that does not utilize the specific type of infrastructure that necessitated the removal, remediation or repair.(c) Enforcement.--A telecommunications carrier that violates this section shall be subject to Chapter 33 (relating to violations and penalties).(d) Regulations.--The commission shall adopt regulations as necessary to implement and enforce this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2638PN3603 - 2 - 1234567891011